North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 2. Hospital Authority.

§ 131E-15.
Title and purpose.

This Part shall be known as the “Hospital Authorities Act.”

The General Assembly finds and declares that in order to protect the public health, safety, and welfare, including that of low income persons, it is necessary that counties and cities be authorized to provide adequate hospital, medical, and health care and that the provision of such care is a public purpose. Therefore, the purpose of this Part is to provide an alternate method for counties and cities to provide hospital, medical, and health care.

History.

1943, c. 780, ss. 1, 2; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-16.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:

“Board of county commissioners” means the legislative body charged with governing the county.

“Bonds” means any bonds or notes issued by the hospital authority pursuant to this Part and the Local Government Finance Act, Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

“City” means any city or town which is, or is about to be, included in the territorial boundaries of a hospital authority when created hereunder.

“City clerk” and “mayor” means the clerk and mayor, respectively, of the city, or the officers thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the clerk and mayor, respectively.

“City council” means the legislative body, council, board of commissioners, board of trustees, or other body charged with governing the city or town.

“Commissioner” means one of the members of a hospital authority appointed in accordance with the provisions of this Part.

“Community general hospital” means a short-term nonfederal hospital that provides diagnostic and therapeutic services to patients for a variety of medical conditions, both surgical and nonsurgical, such services being available for use primarily by residents of the community in which it is located.

“Contract” means any agreement of a hospital authority with or for the benefit of an obligee whether contained in a resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease, bond or other instrument.

“Corporation, foreign or domestic, authorized to do business in North Carolina” means a corporation for profit or having a capital stock which is created and organized under Chapter 55 of the General Statutes or any other general or special act of this State, or a foreign corporation which has procured a certificate of authority to transact business in this State pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes.

“County” means the county which is, or is about to be, included in the territorial boundaries of a hospital authority when created hereunder.

“County clerk” and “chairman of the board of county commissioners” means the clerk and chairman, respectively, of the county or the officers thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the clerk and chairman, respectively.

“Federal government” means the United States of America, or any agency, instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Government” means the State and federal governments and any subdivision, agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

“Hospital authority” means a public body and a body corporate and politic organized under the provisions of this Part.

“Hospital facilities” means any one or more buildings, structures, additions, extensions, improvements or other facilities, whether or not located on the same site or sites, machinery, equipment, furnishings or other real or personal property suitable for health care or medical care; and includes, without limitation, general hospitals; chronic disease, maternity, mental, tuberculosis and other specialized hospitals; nursing homes, including skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities; adult care homes for the aged and disabled; public health center facilities; housing or quarters for local public health departments; facilities for intensive care and self-care; clinics and outpatient facilities; clinical, pathological and other laboratories; health care research facilities; laundries; residences and training facilities for nurses, interns, physicians and other staff members; food preparation and food service facilities; administrative buildings, central service and other administrative facilities; communication, computer and other electronic facilities; fire-fighting facilities; pharmaceutical and recreational facilities; storage space; X ray, laser, radiotherapy and other apparatus and equipment; dispensaries; utilities; vehicular parking lots and garages; office facilities for hospital staff members and physicians; and such other health and hospital facilities customarily under the jurisdiction of or provided by hospitals, or any combination of the foregoing, with all necessary, convenient or related interests in land, machinery, apparatus, appliances, equipment, furnishings, appurtenances, site preparation, landscaping and physical amenities.

(15a)

“Hospital land” means air and ground rights to real property held either in fee or by lease by a hospital authority, with all easements, rights-of-way, appurtenances, landscaping, and physical amenities such as utilities, parking lots, and garages, but excluding other improvements to land described in

G.S. 131E-6(4)

and subsection (15) of this section.

“Municipality” means any county, city, town or incorporated village, other than a city as defined above, which is located within or partially within the territorial boundaries of an authority.

“Real property” means lands, lands under water, structures, and any and all easements, franchises and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise.

“State” means the State of North Carolina.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 3; 1971, c. 780, s. 22; c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 535, s. 19; 1997-233, s. 3.

§ 131E-17.
Creation of a hospital authority.

A hospital authority may be created whenever a city council or a county board of commissioners finds and adopts a resolution finding that it is in the interest of the public health and welfare to create a hospital authority.

After the adoption of a resolution creating a hospital authority, the mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall appoint commissioners in accordance with

G.S. 131E-18

.

The commissioners shall be a public body and a body corporate and politic upon the completion of the procedures described in

G.S. 131E-19

.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 4; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-18.
Commissioners.

The mayor or the chairman of the county board shall appoint the commissioners of the authority. There shall be not less than six and not more than 30 commissioners. Upon a finding that it is in the public interest, the commissioners may adopt a resolution increasing or decreasing the number of commissioners by a fixed number; Provided that no decrease in the number of commissioners shall shorten a commissioner’s term. A certified copy of the resolution and a list of nominees shall be submitted to the mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners for appointments in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

For the initial appointments of commissioners, one-third of the commissioners shall be appointed for a term of one year, one-third for a term of two years, and one-third for a term of three years to achieve staggered terms. All subsequent appointments shall be for three-year terms. A commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and qualified. Vacancies from resignation or removal from office shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term.

The mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall name the first chair of the authority. Thereafter, the commissioners shall elect each subsequent chair from their members. The commissioners shall elect from their members the first vice-chair and all subsequent vice-chairs.

When a commissioner resigns, is removed from office, completes a term of office, or when there is an increase in the number of commissioners, the remaining commissioners shall submit to the mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners a list of nominees for appointment to the commission. The mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall appoint, only from the nominees, the number of commissioners necessary to fill all vacancies. However, the mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners may require the commissioners to submit as many additional lists of nominees as he or she may desire.

The mayor shall file with the city clerk, or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall file with the county clerk, a certificate of appointment or reappointment of a commissioner. The certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of the commissioner.

Commissioners shall receive no compensation for their services, but they shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the discharge of their duties.

For a county with a population of less than 75,000, according to the most recent decennial federal census, the following exceptions to the provisions of this section shall apply:

The commissioners shall be appointed by the county board of commissioners rather than the chairman of the county board of commissioners;

In making appointments under subsection (d) of this section, the county board of commissioners shall consider the nominations of the commissioners of the authority, but the county board of the commissioners is not bound by the nominations and may choose any qualified person.

The foregoing exceptions shall not apply when a county with a population of less than 75,000 jointly establishes a hospital authority with a city.

A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 5; 1971, c. 799; 1973, c. 792; 1981, c. 525, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Craven: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 922, s. 1; 1989, c. 190, s. 1; 1999-15, s. 1; Nash: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1022; Onslow: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 945; Pasquotank: 1959, c. 203, s. 1; 1989, c. 140, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 567, s. 1 (expires July 31, 2000).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

A county board of commissioners does not have the authority to increase the number of commissioners

on a hospital authority located within the county. See opinion of Attorney General to William I. Millar, Attorney at Law, and Thomas S. Stukes, Smith Helms Mulliss & Moore, L.L.P., 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 39 (12/21/99).

This section expressly grants the authority to expand the number of a hospital authority’s commissioners to the hospital authority’s commissioners themselves, rather than to the board of county commissioners; therefore, a resolution of a county board of commissioners which provided that the number of members to the board of commissioners of a hospital authority could not be changed except by resolution of the county board of commissioners was a nullity and had no force and effect. See opinion of Attorney General to Haywood Regional Medical Center, 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 40 (12/21/99).

§ 131E-19.
Incorporation of a hospital authority.

After the commissioners are appointed, they shall present to the Secretary of State an application for incorporation as a hospital authority. The application shall be signed by each of the commissioners and shall set forth:

That the city council or the county board of commissioners has found that it is in the interest of the public health and welfare to create a hospital authority;

That the mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners has appointed them as commissioners;

The name and official residence of each of the commissioners;

A certified copy of the appointment evidencing the commissioners’ right to office, and the date and place of induction into and taking of office;

That they desire the hospital authority to become a public body and a body corporate and politic under this Part;

The term of office of each of the commissioners;

The name which is proposed for the corporation; and

The location and principal office of the corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of this State to take and certify oaths. This officer shall certify upon the application that he or she personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as asserted in the application, and that each subscribed to the application and took the oath in the officer’s presence.

The Secretary of State shall examine the application. If he or she finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation in this State or so nearly similar so as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the application shall be filed and recorded in the appropriate book of record in the Secretary of State’s office. The Secretary of State shall then make and issue to the commissioners a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this Part, under the Seal of the State, and shall record the certificate with the application.

A hospital authority’s name or the location or principal office of the corporation may be changed by the adoption of a resolution by the majority of the authority’s commissioners. A copy of the resolution, duly verified by the chair and secretary of the commission before an officer authorized by the laws of this State to take and certify oaths, shall be delivered to the Secretary of State, along with a conformed copy. If the Secretary of State finds that the proposed name is not identical with that of a person or any corporation of this State, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the resolution shall be filed and recorded in the appropriate book of record in the Secretary of State’s office. A resolution changing the location or principal office of the hospital authority shall be filed and recorded in the appropriate book of record in the Secretary of State’s office. The Secretary of State shall then return to the authority the conformed copy, together with a certificate stating that the attached copy is a true copy of the document in the Secretary of State’s office, that shows the date of filing.

In any legal proceeding, a copy of the certificate of incorporation, certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence and shall be conclusive proof of its filing and contents and the incorporation of the hospital authority in accordance with this Part.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 4; 1966, c. 988, s. 1; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-20.
Boundaries of the authority.

The territorial boundaries of a hospital authority shall include the city or county creating the authority and the area within 10 miles from the territorial boundaries of that city or county. However, a hospital authority may engage in health care activities in a county outside its territorial boundaries pursuant to:

An agreement with a hospital facility if only one hospital currently exists in that county;

An agreement with any hospital if more than one hospital currently exists in that county; or

An agreement with any health care agency if no hospital currently exists in that county.

In no event shall the territorial boundaries of a hospital authority include, in whole or in part, the area of any previously existing hospital authority. All priorities shall be determined on the basis of the time of issuance of the certificates of incorporation by the Secretary of State.

After the creation of an authority, the subsequent existence within its territorial boundaries of more than one city or county shall in no way affect the territorial boundaries of the authority.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 4; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1993, c. 529, s. 6.1.

§ 131E-21.
Conflict of interest.

No commissioner or employee of the hospital authority or that person’s spouse shall do either of the following:

Acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any hospital facility or in any property included or planned to be included in a hospital facility.

Have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any hospital facility, except an employment contract for an employee. The foregoing restriction shall not apply to any contract, undertaking, or other transaction with a bank or banking institution, savings and loan association or public utility in the regular course of its business; Provided that any such contract, undertaking, or other transaction shall be authorized by the commissioners by specific resolution on which no commissioner having an interest, direct or indirect, shall vote.

The fact that a person or that person’s spouse owns ten percent (10%) or less stock of a corporation or has a ten percent (10%) or less ownership in any other business entity or is an employee of that corporation or other business entity does not make the person have an “interest, direct or indirect” as this phrase is used in subsection (a) of this section; provided that, in order for the exception to apply, the contract, undertaking or other transaction shall be authorized by the commissioners by specific resolution on which no commissioner or employee having an interest, direct or indirect, shall vote.

If a commissioner or employee of an authority or that person’s spouse owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in any hospital facility, the commissioner or employee shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the authority and the disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Failure to disclose shall constitute misconduct in office and shall be grounds for a commissioner’s removal from office under

G.S. 131E-22

.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to any commissioner of a hospital authority if (i) the undertaking or contract or series of undertakings or contracts between the hospital authority and one of its officials is approved by specific resolution of the governing body adopted in an open and public meeting and recorded in its minutes and the amount does not exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) for medically related services and twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for other goods or services within a 12-month period; and (ii) the official entering into the contract or undertaking with the hospital authority does not in an official capacity participate in any way or vote.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to any employment relationship between a hospital authority and the spouse of a commissioner of the hospital authority.

A contract entered into in violation of this section is void. A contract that is void under this section may continue in effect until an alternative can be arranged when: (i) immediate termination would result in harm to the public health or welfare, and (ii) the continuation is approved as provided in this subsection. A hospital authority that is a party to the contract may request approval to continue contracts under this subsection from the chairman of the Local Government Commission. Approval of continuation of contracts under this subsection shall be given for the minimum period necessary to protect the public health or welfare.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 7; 1971, c. 749; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1058, s. 1; 2001-409, s. 7.

§ 131E-22.
Removal of commissioners.

The appointing authority, as stated in

G.S. 131E-18

, may remove a commissioner for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office. A commissioner may be removed only after he or she has been given a copy of the charges and provided the opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. A commissioner is entitled to at least 10 days after receipt of the notice to prepare for a hearing before the mayor or the chairman of the county.

An obligee of the authority may file with the mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners written charges that the authority is willfully violating the laws of the State or a term, provision, or covenant to any contract to which the authority is a party. The mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall give each of the commissioners a copy of the charges at least 10 days prior to the hearing on the charges. The commissioners shall be provided an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. The mayor or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall, within 15 days after receipt of the charges, remove any commissioners of the authority who are found to have acquiesced in any willful violation. If a commissioner has not filed a written statement before the hearing with the authority stating his or her objections to or lack of participation in the violation, the commissioner shall be deemed to have acquiesced in a willful violation.

If, after due and diligent search, a commissioner to whom charges are required to be delivered cannot be found within the county where the authority is located, the charges shall be deemed to be served upon the commissioner when it is mailed to the commissioner at the commissioner’s last known address as the same appears on the records of the authority.

In the event of the removal of any commissioner, the mayor shall file in the office of the city clerk, or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall file with the county clerk, a record of the proceedings together with the charges against the commissioner and the findings.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 8; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-23.
Powers of the authority.

An authority shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this Part, including the following powers, which are in addition to those powers granted elsewhere in this Part:

To investigate hospital, medical, and health conditions and the means of improving those conditions;

To determine where inadequate hospital and medical facilities exist;

To accept donations or money, personal property, or real estate for the benefit of the authority and to take title to the same from any person, firm, corporation or society;

To acquire by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation, or otherwise any existing hospital facilities;

To purchase, lease, obtain options upon, or otherwise acquire any real or personal property or any interest therein from any person, firm, corporation, city, county, or government;

To sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge any real or personal property or any interest therein to any person, firm, corporation, city, county or government;

To own, hold, clear and improve property;

To borrow money upon its bonds, notes, debentures, or evidences of indebtedness, as provided for in

G.S. 131E-26

and

G.S. 131E-27

;

To purchase real or personal property pursuant to

G.S. 131E-32

;

To appoint an administrator of a hospital facility and necessary assistants, and any and all other employees necessary or advisable, to fix their compensation, to adopt necessary rules governing their employment, and to remove employees;

To delegate to its agents or employees any powers or duties as it may deem appropriate;

To employ its own counsel and legal staff;

To adopt, amend and repeal bylaws for the conduct of its business;

To enter into contracts for necessary supplies, equipment, or services for the operation of its business;

To appoint committees or subcommittees as it shall deem advisable, to fix their duties and responsibilities, and to do all things necessary in connection with the construction, repair, reconstruction, management, supervision, control and operation of the authority’s business;

To establish procedures for health care providers to secure the privilege of practicing within any hospital operated by the authority pursuant to Part 3 of Article 5 of this Chapter;

To establish reasonable rules governing the conduct of health care providers while on duty in any hospital operated by the facility pursuant to Part 3 of Article 5 of this Chapter;

To provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration or repair of any hospital facility, or any part of a facility;

To enter into any contracts or other arrangements with any municipality, other public agency of this or any other State or of the United States, or with any individual, private organization, or nonprofit association for the provision of hospital, clinical, or similar services;

To lease any hospital facilities to or from any municipality, other public agency of this or any other state or of the United States, or to any individual, corporation, or association upon any terms and subject to any conditions as may carry out the purposes of this Part. The authority may provide for the lessee to use, operate, manage and control the hospital facilities, and to exercise designated powers, in the same manner as the authority itself might do;

To act as an agent for the federal, State or local government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation or management of a hospital facility, or any part thereof;

To arrange with the State, its subdivisions and agencies, and any county or city, to the extent it is within the scope of their respective functions,

To cause the services customarily provided by each to be rendered for the benefit of the hospital authority,

To furnish, plan, replan, install, open or close streets, roads, alleys, sidewalks or similar facilities and to acquire property, options or property rights for the furnishing of property or services for a hospital facility, and

To provide and maintain parks and sewage, water and other facilities for hospital facilities and to lease and rent any of the dwellings or other accommodations or any of the lands, buildings, structures or facilities embraced in any hospital facility and to establish and revise the rents and charges;

To insure the property or the operations of the authority against risks as the authority may deem advisable;

To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which trustees, guardians, executors, administrators, and others acting in a fiduciary capacity may legally invest funds under their control;

To sue and be sued;

To have a seal and to alter it at pleasure;

To have perpetual succession;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority;

To remove vehicles parked on land owned or leased by the hospital authority in areas clearly designated as no parking or restricted parking zones. An owner of a removed vehicle as a condition of regaining possession of the vehicle, shall reimburse the hospital authority for all reasonable costs, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00), incidental to the removal and storage of the vehicle provided that the designation of the area as a no parking or restricted parking zone clearly indicates that the owner may be subject to these costs;

To plan and operate hospital facilities;

To provide teaching and instruction programs and schools for medical students, interns, physicians, nurses, technicians and other health care professionals;

To provide and maintain continuous resident physician and intern medical services;

To adopt, amend and repeal rules and regulations governing the admission of patients and the care, conduct, and treatment of patients;

To establish a fee schedule for services received from hospital facilities and make the services available regardless of ability to pay;

To maintain and operate isolation wards for the care and treatment of mental, contagious, or other similar diseases;

To sell a hospital facility pursuant to

G.S. 131E-8

or

G.S. 131E-13

; and

To agree to limitations upon the exercise of any powers conferred upon the hospital authority by this Part in connection with any loan by a government.

To engage in health care activities outside the State.

A hospital authority may exercise any or all of the powers conferred upon it by this Part, either generally or with respect to any specific hospital facility or facilities, through or by designated agents, including any corporation or corporations which are or shall be formed under the laws of this State.

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to a hospital authority unless otherwise specified by the General Assembly.

History.

1913, c. 42, s. 15; 1917, c. 268; C.S., s. 7273; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.1(l); 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-456, s. 6; 2015-288, s. 5.

Local Modification.

Craven County: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 922, s. 3.

§ 131E-24.
Eminent domain.

A hospital authority may acquire by eminent domain any real property, including fixtures and improvements, which it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this Part. The hospital authority may exercise the power of eminent domain under the provisions of Chapter 40A of the General Statutes or any other statute now in force or subsequently enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

No property belonging to any city, town, or county, any government, religious or charitable organization, or to any existing hospital or clinic may be acquired without its consent. No property belonging to a public utility corporation may be acquired without the approval of the commission or other officer or agency, if any, having regulatory power over the corporation.

The right of eminent domain shall not be exercised unless and until a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the facility has been issued by the North Carolina Utilities Commission. The proceedings leading up to issuing of the certificate of public convenience and necessity, and the right of appeal from the proceedings shall be governed by the Public Utilities Act, Chapter 62 of the General Statutes, and the rights under that act are hereby expressly reserved to all interested parties in the proceedings. In addition to the powers now granted by law to the North Carolina Utilities Commission, the Utilities Commission is authorized to investigate and examine all facilities set up or attempted to be set up under this Part and to determine the question of public convenience and necessity for the facility.

History.

1943, s. 780, s. 10; 1971, c. 799; 1981, c. 919, s. 18; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-25.
Zoning and building laws.

All hospital facilities of the authority shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary and building laws, ordinances and regulations applicable to the locality in which the hospital facility is situated.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 11; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-26.
Revenue bonds and notes.

A hospital authority shall have the power to issue revenue bonds under the Local Government Revenue Bond Act, Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, Article 5, or the bond and revenue anticipation provisions of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, Article 9, for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving, enlarging, bettering, equipping, extending or operating hospital facilities.

A hospital authority shall have the power to borrow for the purposes above enumerated upon its notes or other evidences of indebtedness, subject to the approval of the Local Government Commission as provided in

G.S. 131E-32(c)

. Such approval shall be required regardless of the amount of any such borrowing. Any borrowing by a hospital authority before the date of ratification of Part 2 of Article 2 of this Chapter, whether or not approved by the Local Government Commission, is valid, ratified and confirmed.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-27.
Contracts with federal government.

A hospital authority is authorized:

To borrow money and accept grants from the federal government for or to aid in the construction of a hospital facility;

To acquire any land acquired by the federal government for the construction of a hospital facility; and

To acquire, lease or manage any hospital facility constructed or owned by the federal government.

To these ends, a hospital authority is authorized to enter into contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases or other agreements giving the federal government the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance and operation of the hospital facility. It is the purpose and intent of this Part to authorize every hospital authority to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid and cooperation of the federal government in the construction, maintenance, and operation of hospital facilities.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 19; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-28.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-5, s. 5.3(a), effective May 11, 2016.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 21; 1971, c. 799; 1973, c. 695, s. 6; 1977, c. 268; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1995, c. 46, s. 13, repealed by 2016-5, s. 5.3(a), effective May 11, 2016.

§ 131E-29.
Audits and recommendations.

Each hospital authority shall file with the mayor of the city or the chairman of the county board of commissioners at least annually an audit report by a certified public accountant of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make any recommendations necessary to carry out the purposes of this Part.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 22; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-30.
Appropriations.

Each year the governing body of a city or county in which the hospital authority is located may appropriate and transfer funds to the authority. The appropriations shall be from the General Fund and may not exceed five percent (5%) of the General Fund. Money appropriated and paid to the hospital authority by a city or county shall be deemed a necessary expense of the city or county. However, the appropriations shall not be deemed to be a revenue of the authority for the purpose of bonds of the hospital authority issued under the Local Government Revenue Bond Act, Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, Article 5.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 25; 1971, c. 780, s. 23; c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 131-114.

City of Charlotte: 1955, c. 1114.

§ 131E-31.
Transfers of property by a city or county to a hospital authority.

A city or county may lease, sell, convey, or otherwise transfer, with or without consideration or with nominal consideration, any property, whether real or personal or mixed, to a hospital authority whose territorial boundaries include at least part of the city or county. A hospital authority is authorized to accept such lease, transfer, assignment or conveyance and to bind itself to the performance and observation of any agreements and conditions required by the city or county.

If a city or county sells, conveys, or otherwise irrevocably transfers to a hospital authority property with a market value in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and if the hospital authority accepts this property, the mayor of the city or the chairman of the county board of commissioners shall have the right to name additional commissioners to serve on the authority. The number of additional commissioners shall be such that the proportion of additional commissioners to existing commissioners is approximately equal to the proportion of the total value being transferred to the hospital authority to the total value of property already held by the authority. The determination of the ratios will be made solely by the governing body of the city or county transferring the property to the hospital authority; however, in no event shall fewer than two nor more than nine commissioners be added to the hospital authority. The total number of commissioners shall be increased by the number of commissioners added under this subsection. The times of commencement and expiration of the initial terms of the commissioners being added shall be determined by agreement between the hospital authority and the governing body of the city or county. After the expiration of the initial terms, subsequent terms will be three years. Copies of the agreement setting out the number of persons being added and the terms of each shall be filed with the clerk of the city or the clerk of the county board of commissioners making the transfer and, thereafter, copies of the reports referred to in

G.S. 131E-29

shall be filed with the clerk of the city or the clerk of the county board of commissioners.

History.

1943, c. 780, s. 26; 1961, c. 988, s. 2; 1971, c. 799; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Under this section, a county has the authority to lease hospital property to a hospital authority organized pursuant to the Hospital Authorities Act under a lease that would require the hospital authority to obtain the county’s prior written approval before it exercises some of its powers.
See opinion of Attorney General to Thomas S. Stukes, Esq. Smith Helms Mulliss & Moore, L.L.P., 1997 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 51 (8/18/97).